Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202687-1301
Act, how cited.

Sections 87-1301 to 87-1311 shall be known and may be cited as the Age-Appropriate Online Design Code Act.

Laws 2025, LB504, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB838, § 31.
July 18, 2026